South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S597.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Social Services, relating to Child Placing Agencies Regulations, designated as Regulation Document Number 5308, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. As the administrator of the State's foster care system, the Department of Social Services is responsible for establishing and promulgating rules and regulations for the licensure of agencies engaged in the business of receiving children for care and maintenance related to foster care and adoption. The regulations governing licensing standards for child placing agencies (South Carolina Code of Regulations 114-4910, 4920, 4930, 4940, 4950, 4960, 4970, and 4980) are being amended to make updates necessary to meet the current needs of the State's foster care and adoption systems. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. ----XX----